Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20202-3204
Budget.

A natural resources district may adopt either an annual or a biennial budget pursuant to the Nebraska Budget Act.

Laws 2015, LB164, § 1.

Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.